Hawaii statutes.
§502-23 Sale or lease by reference to lots
or blocks without filing of plans; penalty. Whoever lays out or subdivides
a tract of land into lots or blocks and sells by lot number or block number or
leases by lot number or block number any lot or block in any subdivision
without first having filed in the bureau of conveyances a plan thereof, drawn
in accordance with sections 502-17 to 502-22, or whoever sells by lot number or
block number or leases by lot number or block number any lot or block in any subdivision,
the plan of which subdivision is not on record or on file in the bureau of
conveyances shall be fined not more than $50 for each lot or block or part
thereof so sold or leased. This section and section 502-24 shall not apply to
land held under chapter 501. [L 1911, c 46, §1; am L 1913, c 74, §1; RL 1925,
§3139; RL 1935, §5126; RL 1945, §12726; RL 1955, §343-17; HRS §502-23]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next